Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.115

Parole of life term prisoners—Crimes committed before July 1, 1984.

The indeterminate sentence review board is hereby granted authority to parole any person sentenced to the custody of the department of corrections, under a mandatory life sentence for a crime committed before July 1, 1984, except those persons sentenced to life without the possibility of parole. No such person shall be granted parole unless the person has been continuously confined therein for a period of twenty consecutive years less earned good time: PROVIDED, That no such person shall be released under parole who is subject to civil commitment as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 332; 1989 c 259 s 3; 1951 c 238 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.